Utah statutes.
17B-2a-703.   Additional mosquito abatement district powers.

In addition to the powers conferred on a mosquito abatement district under Section 17B-1-103, a mosquito abatement district may:

(1)  take all necessary and proper steps for the extermination of mosquitos, flies, crickets, grasshoppers, and other insects:

(a)  within the district; or

(b)  outside the district, if lands inside the district are benefitted;

(2)  abate as nuisances all stagnant pools of water and other breeding places for mosquitos, flies, crickets, grasshoppers, or other insects anywhere inside or outside the state from which mosquitos migrate into the district;

(3)  enter upon territory referred to in Subsections (1) and (2) in order to inspect and examine the territory and to remove from the territory, without notice, stagnant water or other breeding places for mosquitos, flies, crickets, grasshoppers, or other insects;

(4)  issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district;

(5)  make a contract to indemnify or compensate an owner of land or other property for injury or damage necessarily caused by the exercise of district powers or arising out of the use, taking, or damage of property for a district purpose; and

(6)  establish a reserve fund, not to exceed the greater of 25% of the district's annual operating budget and $50,000, to pay for extraordinary abatement measures, including a vector-borne public health emergency.

